Idaho, session 2025, H0311.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-2903, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-2903. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a license or permit under
this chapter.
(2) "Audiologist" means a natural person who meets the requirements of
this chapter, is duly licensed in accordance with this chapter and is engaged
in the practice of audiology.
(3) "Board" means the speech, hearing and communication services li-
censure board.
(4) "Department" means the department of self-governing agencies.
(5) "Division" means the division of occupational and professional li-
censes.
(6) "Hearing aid" means any wearable electronic instrument or other de-
vice designed for the purpose of aiding or compensating for a loss of human
hearing and any parts, attachments or accessories, including earmolds at-
tached to the hearing aid, but excluding batteries and cords. "Hearing aid"
does not include those devices classified by the federal food and drug admin-
istration as assistive listening devices.
(7) "Hearing aid dealer and fitter" means a person licensed pursuant to
this chapter to provide hearing aid evaluations and to sell, dispense and fit
hearing aids in the state of Idaho.
(8) "Hearing aid evaluation" means the measurement of human hearing for
the purpose of selecting or adapting a hearing aid, and not for obtaining
medical diagnosis or legal documentation, and includes the following:
(a) Air conduction threshold testing;
(b) Bone conduction threshold testing;
(c) Speech reception threshold testing;
(d) Speech discrimination testing;
(e) Most comfortable loudness level testing; and
(f) Uncomfortable loudness level testing.
(9) "Improper fitting" means a pattern of hearing aid selections or
adaptations that cause physical damage to any portion of the ear in which the


electroacoustic characteristics of the hearing aid are inadequate for the
consumer, or in which the hearing aid is physically or acoustically unsuited
to the consumer including, but not limited to:
(a) An all-in-the-ear hearing aid that continually falls out of the
ear;
(b) Any hearing aid or earmold that causes inappropriate feedback, pain
or discomfort to the ear within thirty (30) days of the original deliv-
ery of the hearing aid to the consumer;
(c) Fitting a consumer with impacted cerumen; or
(d) Fitting a consumer with either an apparent unilateral sensorineu-
ral hearing loss or a significant air-bone gap without prior medical
evaluation and approval.
(10) "License" means a license issued by the board under this chapter.
(11) "Practice of audiology" means to apply the principles, methods and
procedures of measurement, evaluation, testing, counseling, consultation
and instruction that relate to the development and disorders of hearing,
vestibular functions and related language and speech disorders to prevent,
modify or rehabilitate the disorders or to assist individuals in auditory
and related skills for communication, and may include intraoperative moni-
toring and the fitting, adjustment, programming, selling and dispensing of
hearing aids and assistive devices.
(12) "Practice of fitting and dealing in hearing aids" means the selec-
tion, adaptation, dispensing, fitting or sale of hearing aids, and includes
the testing of hearing by means of an audiometer, or by any other device de-
signed specifically for these purposes. The practice also includes the mak-
ing of impressions for earmolds.
(13) "Practice of sign language interpreting" means the application of
the process of providing effective communication between and among persons
who are deaf, hard of hearing or deaf-blind, speech impaired and those who
can hear. The process includes, but is not limited to, communication between
American sign language or other forms of manual communication and English.
The process may also involve various other modalities that involve visual,
gestural and tactile methods.
(14) "Practice of speech-language pathology" means the application of
principles, methods and procedures of measurement, evaluation, testing,
counseling, rehabilitation, screening, consultation and instruction that
relate to the development and disorders of human communication including,
but not limited to, speech (articulation, fluency, voice, accent reduction)
and language, swallowing, cognitive communication disorders, augmentative
and alternative communication systems and related hearing disorders.
(15) "Provisional permit" means a permit issued to an applicant who is
registered to obtain required experience to become licensed.
(16) "Sign language interpreter" means a natural person who meets the
requirements of this chapter, is duly licensed in accordance with this chap-
ter, and who engages in the practice of sign language interpreting.
(17) "Speech-language pathologist" means a natural person who meets the
requirements of this chapter, is duly licensed in accordance with this chap-
ter, and who engages in the practice of speech-language pathology.
(18) "Speech-language pathologist aide" means a natural person who
meets the requirements of this chapter, is duly licensed in accordance


with this chapter, and who works under the direction and supervision of a
speech-language pathologist. A speech-language pathologist aide shall
not act or provide services independently of a supervising speech-language
pathologist licensed in Idaho.
(19) "Speech-language pathologist assistant" means a natural person
who meets the requirements of this chapter, is duly licensed in accor-
dance with this chapter, and works under the direction and supervision of
a speech-language pathologist. A speech-language pathologist assistant
shall not act or provide services independently of a supervising speech-lan-
guage pathologist licensed in Idaho.
(20) "Video remote interpreting provider" means a person or entity reg-
istered to do business in the state of Idaho and licensed to provide video re-
mote interpreting services.
(21) "Video remote interpreting services" means the use of videoconfer-
encing technology with the intent to provide the practice of sign language
interpreting.
SECTION 2. That Section 54-2905, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-2905. EXEMPTIONS. (1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
restrict:
(a) Any person licensed or regulated by the state of Idaho from engag-
ing in the profession or practice for which he or she is licensed or
regulated, including, but not limited to, any certified or accredited
teacher of the deaf, nurse, physician, occupational therapist, physi-
cal therapist, surgeon, or any other licensed or regulated practitioner
of the healing arts;
(b) Any employee working under the direct supervision of those per-
sons referred to in this section, as long as such employee does not
hold himself or herself out as an audiologist, speech-language pathol-
ogist, speech-language pathologist aide or assistant, sign language
interpreter, hearing aid dealer or fitter, or a person engaged in the
practice of audiology, speech-language pathology, sign language inter-
preting, or hearing aid dealing and fitting; or
(c) Any person working in an Idaho public school setting who has re-
ceived and holds, in good standing, a pupil personnel services certifi-
cate with a speech-language pathologist endorsement or audiologist en-
dorsement, or any person working as a speech-language pathologist aide
or speech-language pathologist assistant, as those terms are defined in
section 54-2903, Idaho Code, in a public school setting under the direc-
tion and supervision of a person with such endorsement in good standing.
Such persons, while practicing in the public school setting, shall be
exempt from all provisions of this chapter; provided however, that
any such person working in an Idaho public school setting with a pupil
personnel services certificate with a speech-language pathologist en-
dorsement or audiology endorsement, or a speech-language pathologist
aide or speech-language pathologist assistant, shall be prohibited
from practicing independently in a setting other than a public school
unless such person is duly licensed as set forth in this chapter.


(2) Licensure shall not be required for persons pursuing a course of
study leading to a degree in audiology, speech-language pathology, sign lan-
guage interpreting, or hearing aid dealing and fitting at a college or uni-
versity with a curriculum acceptable to the board provided that:
(a) Activities and services otherwise regulated by this chapter con-
stitute a part of a planned course of study at that institution;
(b) Such persons are designated by a title such as "intern," "trainee,"
"student," or by other such title clearly indicating the status appro-
priate to their level of education; and
(c) Such persons work under the supervision of a person licensed by
this state to practice audiology, speech-language pathology, sign
language interpreting, or hearing aid dealing and fitting in accor-
dance with administrative rules governing supervision as adopted by the
board. The supervising audiologist, speech-language pathologist, sign
language interpreter, or hearing aid dealer and fitter accepts full
responsibility for the activities and services provided by such persons
supervised.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall restrict a person residing in another
state or country and authorized to practice audiology, speech-language
pathology, sign language interpreting, or hearing aid dealing or fitting
in that jurisdiction, who is called in consultation by a person licensed in
this state to practice audiology, speech-language pathology, sign language
interpreting, or hearing aid dealing and fitting, or who, for the purpose of
furthering audiology, speech-language pathology, sign language interpret-
ing, or hearing aid dealing and fitting education, is invited into this state
to conduct a lecture, clinic or demonstration, while engaged in activities
in connection with the consultation, lecture, clinic or demonstration, as
long as such person does not open an office or appoint a place to meet clients
or receive calls in this state.
(4) The provisions of this chapter regarding licensure of sign language
interpreters shall not apply to the following:
(a) A person holding a current license is allowed to interpret in a
preschool and/or K-12 setting pursuant to section 33-1304, Idaho Code.;
(b) A person working in an Idaho public school setting who engages in
the practice of sign language interpreting and meets the requirements
of and is interpreting within the scope of the Idaho educational inter-
preter act, chapter 13, title 33, Idaho Code.;
(c) A person who is deaf or hard of hearing and does not possess inter-
preter certification or credentials may, at the discretion of the board
by rule, perform in the role of a deaf interpreter.;
(d) A student enrolled in a sign language interpreter educational pro-
gram provided by an accredited college or university performing sign
language interpretation as an integral part of the student's course of
study and as supervised by a licensed sign language interpreter.;
(e) Individuals licensed and/or state or nationally certified as sign
language interpreters in another state authorizing such individuals to
practice sign language interpreting in Idaho for a period not to exceed
thirty (30) days pursuant to such terms and requirements as set forth in
the rules of the board.;


(f) A person providing services to the activities and services of any
religious denomination or sect;
(g) Interpreting in an inconsequential situation, which means the
level of significance is such that a licensed interpreter would not be
deemed necessary for effective communication during that interaction.
Inconsequential situations may include, but are not limited to: order-
ing food at a restaurant, checking into a hotel or purchasing an item
from a retailer;
(h) A person providing services in a private, noncommercial, family
event; or
(i) Exigent emergency circumstances for temporary interpreting ser-
vices until a qualified interpreter can be obtained.; or
(j) A person employed by a person or an entity that is a licensed video
remote interpreting provider in this state.
(5) Interpreters and video remote interpreting services performing in-
terpretation for the judicial department will be selected and assigned and
will provide interpreting services pursuant to rules and orders promulgated
by the Idaho supreme court to ensure full access to the courts and court ser-
vices for all deaf and hard of hearing persons as required by the due process
provisions of the United States and Idaho constitutions and the provisions
of the Americans with disabilities act (ADA).
SECTION 3. That Chapter 29, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-2916B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-2916B. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE -- VIDEO REMOTE INTERPRET-
ING PROVIDER. To be eligible for licensure as a video remote interpreting
provider, the applicant shall:
(1) File a written application with the board on forms prescribed and
furnished by the board. A nonrefundable application fee shall accompany the
completed written application. Such fees shall be established by the admin-
istrative rules of the board, subject to legislative approval, and shall be
in such amounts as are reasonable and necessary for the proper execution and
enforcement of this chapter;
(2) Provide a roster of all employed sign language interpreters; and
(3) Provide verification acceptable to the board that all employed sign
language interpreters meet the qualifications of a sign language inter-
preter in this state and have:
(a) Successfully passed a nationally recognized competency examina-
tion approved by the board or achieved certification as defined by board
rule;
(b) Successfully graduated from a four (4) year course at an accredited
high school or the equivalent;
(c) Successfully passed an examination approved by the board;
(d) Never had a license or certification revoked or otherwise sanc-
tioned as part of disciplinary action from this or any other state;
(e) Never been convicted of, found guilty of, or received a with-
held judgment or a suspended sentence in this state or in any other
state for any crime that is deemed relevant in accordance with section
67-9411(1), Idaho Code;


(f) Never been found by the board to have engaged in conduct prohibited
by this chapter;
(g) Maintained required continuing education units under nationally
recognized certification or other certification recognized by the
board; and
(h) Knowledge of and compliance with the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.